Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-13] Action by majority. If
there is more than one arbitrator, the powers of an arbitrator shall be
exercised by a majority of the arbitrators, but all of them shall conduct the
hearing under section 658A-15(c). [L 2001, c 265, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next